District of Columbia statutes.
28-2504

Fiduciary’s bond — Discharge only after accounting.

A person appointed by order or decree of the court to a fiduciary office may not discharge his bond for the due performance of his duties, by receipts, releases, or acquittances from himself, as attorney for parties interested, to himself as fiduciary; but the funds or estate for the application whereof he is responsible shall be considered as remaining in his hands, and the bond shall continue in force as against both principal and sureties until the funds or estate are fully accounted for and paid over or delivered to the parties interested therein, or their attorney, other than himself.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 671, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-2504.
1973 Ed., § 28-2504.